dev/sk-nouns.dix
    <pardef n="koť/uha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhy</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhe</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhu</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhe</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uha</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhou</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uha</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>úh</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhám</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhy</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhách</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhy</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhami</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uhy</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of koť/uha__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>uh</l>
        <r>uha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- koť/uha__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="prášnic/a__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>u</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>i</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ou</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>a</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iam</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>iach</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ami</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>e</l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of prášnic/a__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l>
        <r>a<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- prášnic/a__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="BASE__Gambia"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="dl/aha__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahy</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahe</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahu</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahe</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aha</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahou</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>aha</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>áh</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahám</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahy</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahách</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahy</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahami</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ahy</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of dl/aha__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ah</l>
        <r>aha<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- dl/aha__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>
    <pardef n="stabil/ita__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ity</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itu</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ite</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itou</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ita</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ít</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="gen"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itám</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="dat"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ity</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="acc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itách</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="loc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ity</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="voc"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>itami</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="ins"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ity</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/><s n="nom"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>


    <!-- Below is content of a subsequent definition of stabil/ita__n -->
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>it</l>
        <r>ita<s n="n"/></r>
      </p><!-- stabil/ita__BASESG' was replaced -->
        <par n="vyvýšenin/ka__SG"/> 
    </e>


    </pardef>

    <e lm="Zita"><i>Z</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="agresivita"><i>agresiv</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="anuita"><i>anu</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="banalita"><i>banal</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bocianica"><i>bocianic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="brutalita"><i>brutal</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="bránica"><i>bránic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="chaluha"><i>chal</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="cárica"><i>cáric</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="danielica"><i>danielic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diablica"><i>diablic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diaľnica"><i>diaľnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dievčica"><i>dievčic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diskontinuita"><i>diskontinu</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="diviačica"><i>diviačic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="dlaha"><i>dl</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="emocionalita"><i>emocional</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="expresivita"><i>expresiv</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="genialita"><i>genial</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hriešnica"><i>hriešnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="humanita"><i>human</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="hviezdica"><i>hviezdic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="húfnica"><i>húfnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="imunita"><i>imun</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="intenzita"><i>intenz</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kajúcnica"><i>kajúcnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kapacita"><i>kapac</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="komodita"><i>komod</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="koťuha"><i>koť</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="kuriozita"><i>kurioz</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="lokalita"><i>lokal</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="modalita"><i>modal</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="muflónica"><i>muflónic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="mŕtvica"><i>mŕtvic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="nulita"><i>nul</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="obsluha"><i>obsl</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="odvaha"><i>odv</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="parádnica"><i>parádnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="perverzita"><i>perverz</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="podlaha"><i>podl</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="povaha"><i>pov</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="povíchrica"><i>povíchric</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prevaha"><i>prev</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prosperita"><i>prosper</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="prášnica"><i>prášnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="pľuha"><i>pľ</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="retroaktivita"><i>retroaktiv</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="riasnica"><i>riasnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="rozvaha"><i>rozv</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="samoobsluha"><i>samoobsl</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="sietnica"><i>sietnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="snaha"><i>sn</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="solidarita"><i>solidar</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="spádnica"><i>spádnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stuha"><i>st</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="struha"><i>str</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="stálica"><i>stálic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="suverenita"><i>suveren</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tuha"><i>t</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="tvárnica"><i>tvárnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="viskozita"><i>viskoz</i><par n="stabil/ita__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vlaha"><i>vl</i><par n="dl/aha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="vzpruha"><i>vzpr</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="víchrica"><i>víchric</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="črievica"><i>črievic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
    <e lm="šmuha"><i>šm</i><par n="koť/uha__n"/></e>
    <e lm="štátnica"><i>štátnic</i><par n="prášnic/a__n"/></e>
